Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-207.01
Authorized inspector, defined.

Authorized inspector
means a person who meets the requirements established in rules and regulations
of the commission to inspect for aquatic invasive species and includes, but
is not limited to, a conservation officer and a peace officer as defined in
section 49-801.

Laws 2012, LB391, § 4.